dist/turkspell-v0.6-dd/tr.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX ≚ mak nmadılar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmadılarsa mak
SFX ≚ mak nmadım mak
SFX ≚ mak nmadın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmadınız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmadıysa mak
SFX ≚ mak nmadıysak mak
SFX ≚ mak nmadıysalar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmadıysam mak
SFX ≚ mak nmadıysan mak
SFX ≚ mak nmadıysanız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmak mak
SFX ≚ mak nmak/∄∧≋∡≉∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaksızın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmakta mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktadır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktadırlar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktalar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktalardır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktalarsa mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktansa mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktasın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktasınız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktaydı mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktaydık mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktaydılar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktaydım mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktaydın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktaydınız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktayken mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktaymış mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktaymışlar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktaymışsın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktaymışsınız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktaymışım mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktaymışız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktaysa mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktaysak mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktaysam mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktaysan mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktaysanız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktayslar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktayım mak
SFX ≚ mak nmaktayız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalı mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıdır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıdırlar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalılar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalılardı mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalılardır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalılarmış mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalılarsa mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalısın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalısındır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalısınız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalısınızdır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıydı mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıydık mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıydılar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıydım mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıydın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıydınız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıyken mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıymış mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıymışlar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıymışsın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıymışsınız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıymışım mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıymışız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıysa mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıysak mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıysam mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıysan mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıysanız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıyslar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıyım mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıyımdır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıyız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmalıyızdır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmam mak
SFX ≚ mak nmama mak
SFX ≚ mak nmama/∆≥⊆∧≋≬≪≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamadan mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamak mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamak/∄∧≋∡≉∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaksızın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamakta mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktadır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktadırlar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktalar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktalardır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktalarsa mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktansa mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktasın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktasınız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktaydı mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktaydık mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktaydılar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktaydım mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktaydın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktaydınız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktayken mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktaymış mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktaymışlar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktaymışsın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktaymışsınız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktaymışım mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktaymışız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktaysa mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktaysak mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktaysam mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktaysan mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktaysanız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktayslar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktayım mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaktayız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalı mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalıdır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalılar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalılardır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalılarsa mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalısın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalısındır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalısınız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalısınızdır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalıydı mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalıydık mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalıydılar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalıydım mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalıydın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalıydınız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalıyken mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalıysa mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalıysak mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalıysam mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalıysan mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalıysanız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalıyslar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalıyım mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalıyımdır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalıyız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamalıyızdır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamayıncaya mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaz mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamaz/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamazken mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamdır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamış mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamış/∄∀≣∧≋∫∡≉∺≂∲∶∼∽∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışlar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışlardı mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışlardık mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışlardılar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışlardım mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışlardın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışlardınız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışlarsa mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışlık mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışlık/∧≋∡≉∺∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışlığ/X∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışsa mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışsak mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışsalar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışsam mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışsan mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışsanız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışsın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışsındır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışsınız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışsınızdır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamıştı mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamıştık mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamıştılar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamıştım mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamıştın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamıştınız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamıştır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışım mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışımdır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmamışızdır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasa mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasak mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasalar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasalardı mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasam mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasan mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasana mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasanız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasanıza mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasaydı mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasaydık mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasaydılar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasaydım mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasaydın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasaydınız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasaymış mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasaymışlar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasaymışsın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasaymışsınız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasaymışım mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasaymışız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmasınlar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabildi mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabildik mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabildik/∨≌∢≊∻≩ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabildiğ/X∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabildikçe mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilebilirlik mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilebilirlik/∨≌∢≊∻≩ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilebilirliğ/X∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilecakken mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilecek mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilecek/∨≌∢≊∻≩ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabileceğ/X∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabileli mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilemeden mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilen mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilen/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilerek mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilerken mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilesi mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilesi/∛≧⊇∨≌≮≫≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilici mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilici/∛≧⊇∨≌≮≫≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilince mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilinceye mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilip mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilir mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilirdi mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilirdik mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilirdim mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilirdin mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilirdiniz mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilirim mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabiliriz mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilirken mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilirler/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilirlerdi mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilirlik mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilirlik/∨≌∢≊∻≩ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilirliğ/X∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilirmiş mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilirse mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilirsin mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilirsiniz mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabiliyor mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabiliyordu mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabiliyorlar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabiliyormuş mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabiliyorsa mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabiliyorsun mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabiliyorsunuz mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabiliyorum mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabiliyoruz mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabiliş mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabiliş/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilme mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilme/∛≧⊇∨≌≮≫≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilmeden mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilmek mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilmek/∙∨≌∢≊≩ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilmeksizin mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilmeyinceye mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilmez mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilmez/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilmezken mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilmiş mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilmiş/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilmişlik mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilmişlik/∨≌∢≊∻≩ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilmişliğ/X∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayabilse mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacak mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacak/∧≋∡≉∺∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacağ/X∀≣∫≂∲∶∼∽∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacakken mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacaklar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacaklardır mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacaklarsa mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacakmış mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacakmışlar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacakmışsın mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacakmışsınız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacakmışım mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacakmışız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacaksa mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacaksak mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacaksalar/∎ mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacaksam mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacaksan mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacaksanız mak
SFX ≚ mak nmayacaksın mak
